Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 226 Pawnbrokers

226.010.
Pawnbroker defined.

Any person who loans money on deposit of personal property, or who deals in the purchase of personal property on condition of selling the property back again at a stipulated price, or who makes a public display at his place of business of the sign generally used by pawnbrokers to denote their business, or who publicly exhibits a sign advertising money to loan on personal property or deposit is a pawnbroker.

History.

3787.

226.020.
Bond of pawnbroker.

Every person to whom a city or county license is granted to carry on the business of a pawnbroker shall annually enter into bond to the city or county, with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the city legislative body or the county fiscal court, in the penal sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The bond shall be conditioned that he will observe the provisions of KRS

226.030

to

226.050

, and the ordinances and laws in force in the city or county not inconsistent with KRS

226.030

to

226.050

.

History.

3788: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 237, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The police court of a fifth-class city has jurisdiction to punish persons for failure to obtain and have in force the duly approved bond required by this section provided that the city has issued the pawnbroker a license.

OAG 76-578

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Unlawful transactions with minors, Penal Code, KRS

530.070

.

226.030.
Pawnbroker not to receive article from minor or during night.

No pawnbroker shall receive, by way of pledge or pawn, any article whatever from a minor at any time, nor from any person between 8 p.m. and 7 a.m.

History.

3789.

226.040.
Pawnbroker to keep register of loans and purchases — Report to online transaction recording service accessible to law enforcement — Information to be included in register — State officers may inspect — Holding period before resale — Release of stolen property to law enforcement.

Every pawnbroker shall keep a register of all loans and purchases of all articles by the pawnbroker from the general public. The register shall:

Be reported to an online, Internet-based transaction recording service accessible to law enforcement agencies;

Show the dates and the amounts of all loans or purchases by the pawnbroker from the general public, and the names and:

A driver’s license number;

Another state or federally issued picture identification card number; or

If the identification specified in subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph is not available, a Social Security number may be accepted;

of all persons who have left any property that has been pawned or sold;

At all times be available to the inspection of any law enforcement officer of this state when in the discharge of his or her official duty; and

Contain a full description of all property purchased by the pawnbroker from the general public or received on deposit as collateral or security. When requested by law enforcement and pertaining to an investigation, a photograph of the merchandise shall be made available to law enforcement if the property is still in the possession of the pawnbroker. For purposes of this paragraph, “full description” includes but is not limited to:

Make;

Model;

Color;

Size;

Manufacturer;

Vintage; and

Distinguishing marks or characteristics.

When secondhand merchandise is sold to a pawnbroker, the merchandise shall be held for a minimum of twelve (12) days before being resold.

Prior to the release of property to a representative of law enforcement, the law enforcement representative shall provide to the pawnbroker a case report or other documentation that the item has been reported as stolen.

HISTORY:

1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942; 2018 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Pawnbrokers must at all times keep their register open to inspection by city police officers as well as all other officers of this state.

OAG 71-255

.

“State” is used in the broad sense as including political subdivisions such as cities, and not in the narrow sense of central state government only.

OAG 71-255

.

226.050.
Pawnbroker to give ticket and receipt for articles — Sale after sixty days — Notice before sale.

Every pawnbroker shall give a plain written or printed ticket for the loan to the person negotiating or selling, and a plain written or printed receipt of the articles that have been purchased, or upon which money is loaned, having on each a copy of the entries required by KRS

226.040

to be kept in his register. He shall not make any charge for the ticket or receipt.

A pawnbroker may sell any article pawned after the expiration of sixty (60) days from the maturity of the loan, provided that, not less than ten (10) days before making the sale, the pawnbroker shall have given notice to the person by whom the article was pawned, by mail addressed to the post office address of such person as shown on the pawnbroker’s register, notifying such person that, unless he redeems the article within ten (10) days from the date of mailing said notice, the article will be sold.

History.

3790: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 216, § 3; 2008, ch. 69, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

226.060.
Special provisions for city, and county containing city of first class or consolidated local government.

The chief of police of a city of the first class or the chief of police of a county containing a city of the first class, or the chief of police of a consolidated local government, and persons acting by his orders may examine the books of any pawnbroker or his clerk, if they deem it necessary when in search of stolen property. Any person who has in his possession a pawnbroker’s ticket issued by a pawnbroker in a city of the first class or in a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government shall, when accompanied by a policeman or by an order from the chief or captain of police, be permitted to examine property purporting to be pawned by that ticket. No property shall be removed from the possession of any pawnbroker without the process of law required by the existing laws of the state, or the laws and ordinances of the local government regulating pawnbrokers.

History.

2887: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 237, § 2; 2002, ch. 346, § 211, effective July 15, 2002.

226.070.
Daily reports in cities and unincorporated areas.

Every pawnbroker in a city or in the unincorporated area of any county shall by 11 a.m. each day, make available to the chief of police of the city, the chief law enforcement officer of the county, or to the Department of Kentucky State Police, a true and correct written report of all goods received by him or her, whether by pawn or purchase, during the twenty-four (24) hours preceding each report. The report shall describe the goods as accurately as practicable.

The chief of police of the city, the chief law enforcement officer of the county, or the Department of Kentucky State Police shall furnish blanks for the reports required by subsection (1) of this section.

History.

3792, 3793: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 237, § 3; 1990, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 85, § 258, effective June 26, 2007.

226.080.
Maximum interest — Service charges.

Any pawnbroker, as defined in KRS

226.010

, may, in loaning money on deposit of personal property, charge, contract for or receive interest at a rate not exceeding two percent (2%) per month on the unpaid principal balance of the loan, and may charge, contract for and receive a reasonable fee, not to exceed one-fifth (1/5) of the value of the loan per month, for investigating the title, storing and insuring the property, closing the loan, making daily reports to local law enforcement officers and for other expenses, losses and incidental costs associated with servicing such loans. It is further provided that such fee when made and collected shall not be deemed interest for any purpose of law. No pawnbroker shall directly or indirectly charge, receive or contract for any interest or consideration greater than that allowed by this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 216, § 1; 1986, ch. 186, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

226.090.
Receipts for payments.

Every pawnbroker, upon receiving any payment of money from a borrower, shall give to such person a plain and complete receipt for such payment, specifying separately the amount applied to principal and the amount applied to interest. In a case where the pawnbroker has purchased personal property under an agreement to sell it back at a stipulated price, the pawnbroker shall, on receiving any payment of money from the person from whom the property was purchased, give such person a receipt stating the original purchase price, the stipulated resale price, and the amount received.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 216, § 2.

226.100.
Powers of county police in enforcing chapter.

Enforcement of the provisions of this chapter shall be within the jurisdiction of the fiscal court of any county except that county police shall not exercise authority within the corporate limits of a city of ten thousand or more population. County police for the purpose of locating stolen goods, may carry out the provisions of KRS

226.060

in a city of any size or in the county area of their jurisdiction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 237, § 5.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section relates to law enforcement responsibilities only and not to court jurisdiction and the enforcement of KRS Chapter 226 is a responsibility of the county police in unincorporated territory and in cities in the county of less than 10,000 population generally, except that the county police, for the purpose of locating stolen goods, may enforce this section in a city of any size.

OAG 76-578

.

226.990.
Penalties.

Any pawnbroker who violates any of the provisions of KRS

226.020

to

226.050

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and his license may be forfeited to the use of the city or county in which the prosecution takes place.

Any pawnbroker or pawnbroker’s clerk who violates any of the provisions of KRS

226.060

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any pawnbroker who violates any of the provisions of KRS

226.070

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any pawnbroker who violates any of the provisions of KRS

226.080

or

226.090

shall be subject to the penalties provided in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

2887, 3791, 3794: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 216, § 4; 1966, ch. 255, § 207; 1972, ch. 237, § 4.